conf/si_SLK.aff
SET UTF-8

#ප, පර, අව, ස, අනු, නි, දු, වි, අ, අදි, සු, උ, අබි, පිරි, උප,අප, පස්, පිළි, අති, පි
PFX A Y 1
PFX A 0 ප   .

PFX B Y 1
PFX B 0 සු   .

PFX C Y 1
PFX C 0 අනු .

PFX D Y 1
PFX D 0 නි  .

PFX E Y 1
PFX E 0 ඉ   .

PFX F Y 1
PFX F Y අබි .

PFX G Y 1
PFX G 0 පර  .

PFX H Y 1
PFX H 0 ස   .

PFX I Y 2
PFX I 0 දු  .
PFX J 0 වි  .

SFX K Y 1
SFX K 0 යේ  ය

SFX L Y 7
SFX L ක ට   .   [ය]කට
SFX L 0 ට   .
SFX L 0 ට   ම   [ම]ට
SFX L 0 ම   .   [^ම]ම
SFX L 0 ක   .
SFX L 0 ය   .
SFX L 0 ව   .

SFX M Y 4
SFX M 0 ක්  .   
SFX M 0 න්  .   [^යි]න්
SFX M යි න් .    [යි]න්
SFX M 0 ත්  .

SFX N Y 1
SFX N 0 න්ට    .  

SFX O Y 2
SFX O 0 වරයා    .
SFX O 0 තුමා    .

SFX Q Y 2
SFX Q 0 වෝ  .
SFX Q 0 ගේ  .

SFX R Y 2
SFX R 0 යෙක් යා
SFX R 0 යක .

SFX S Y 2
SFX S 0 කින්    .
SFX S 0 වෙක්    .

SFX T Y 6
SFX T 0 ේ .
SFX T 0 ී   .
SFX T 0 ි   .
SFX T 0 ෝ   .
SFX T 0 ූ   .
SFX T 0 ේ   .

SFX U Y 2
SFX U 0 වේදී    .
SFX U 0 ෙදි    .
