conf/si_SLK.dic
45
නායක/C
දුක්/DG
ප්රදේශය/LMT
මම/L
ඔහු/Q
පොලීසිය/LMT
අධිකරණය/LM
පුද්ගලයා/R
ස්ථානය/LMT
දිස්ත්රික්කය/LMT
අග්රාමාත්ය/O
සංගමය/LMT
සාමාජිකයා/R
කාන්තාව/LM
නිවේදනය/LMT
නියෝජිතයා/R
අත්අඩංගුව/LU
අනතුර/MS
ජනතාව/LM
පොලිස්පති/O
ත්රස්තවාද/M
සැකකරු/S
නියෝගය/LMT
අපේක්ෂකයා/R
නිවස/M
විරෝධතාව/RU
කමිටුව/M
විරෝධී/L
යතුරුපැදිය/M
මැතිවරණය/LMT
හෙළිදරව්ව/MU
ජපානය/LMT
සේවකයා/R
මණ්ඩලය/LMT
කුසලානය/l
සෙබළෙකු/Q
ඥාතීන්ට/N
ගැනීම/L
දවස/T
සිදුව/T
මිහිරි/B
මිත්‍රය/T
ජාවාරම/M
කුමන්ත්‍රණය/L
පාර්ලිමේන්තුව/LMTU
පාර්ලිමේන්තු/U
